Utah statutes.
34-43-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Certified disaster service volunteer" means any person who has completed
the necessary training for and has been certified as a disaster service
specialist by the American Red Cross.
(2)  "Disaster" means any disaster designated at Level III or higher in the
American National Red Cross Regulations and Procedures.
(3)  "State agency" means any state office, officer, official, department,
board, commission, institution, bureau, agency, division, or unit of the
state, including those within the legislative and judicial branches of the
state government.
